Montana, session 2025, LC2578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
l
Section 1. Section 15-6-305, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-305. Property tax assistance program -- fixed or limited income -- inflation adjustments.
(1) There is a property tax assistance program that provides graduated levels of tax assistance for the purpose
of assisting citizens with limited or fixed incomes. To be eligible for the program, applicants must meet the
requirements of 15-6-302.
(2) The first $350,000 in market value of residential real property qualifying for the property tax
assistance program is taxed at the rates established by 15-6-134 multiplied by a percentage figure based on
the applicant's qualifying income determined from the following table:
Income Income Percentage
Single Person Married Couple Multiplier
Head of Household
$0 - $13,590 $0 - $18,310 20%
$13,591 - $18,580 $18,311 - $27,667 50%
$18,581 - $27,621 $27,668 - $37,019 70%
$0 - $15,060 $0 - $20,440 20%
$15,061 - $20,580 $20,441 - $30,646 50%
$20,581 - $30,595 $30,647 - $41,005 70%

(3) The market value in subsection (2) must be adjusted after each reappraisal cycle provided for
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2578.1
in 15-7-111 using an inflation index based on the change in appraised value of a median value of residential
real property participating in the property tax assistance program.
(4) The qualifying income levels contained in subsection (2) must be adjusted annually using the
PCE inflation factor defined in 15-6-301, rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount. If the adjustment results
in a decrease in qualifying income levels from the previous year, the qualifying income levels must remain the
same for that year."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to property tax years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****